Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-158
Judges; administrator; clerk; bond or insurance; oath.

Each of the judges of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, the administrator of the compensation court, and the clerk of the compensation court shall, before entering upon or discharging any of the duties of his or her office, be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201 and such judges, administrator, and clerk shall, before entering upon the duties of their offices, take and subscribe the statutory oath of office.

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 8, p. 191;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-169;

R.S.1943, § 48-158;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 88;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 20;

Laws 2005, LB 13, § 16.